Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2134.
hereby enacts as follows:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1. Section 7102 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 7102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Fire department identification number" or "FDID number." A unique, five-character identifier assigned by the commissioner to identify an individual fire company, volunteer rescue company, hazardous materials team or specialty team within this Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. Section 7383(a) of Title 35 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 7383. State Fire Commissioner.(a) State Fire Commissioner.--There shall be a State Fire Commissioner, who shall report to the Governor on all matters concerning fire services in this Commonwealth. The Office of the State Fire Commissioner shall be within the agency for administrative purposes only, and the commissioner shall not report to the director of the agency. The commissioner shall have the power and duty to:* * *(12) Issue and revoke fire department identification numbers. The commissioner may establish guidelines for the issuance and revocation of FDID numbers. The commissioner shall transmit the guidelines to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.20260HB2134PN2759 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 3. Sections 7801, 7802 and 7812 of Title 35 are amended to read:§ 7801. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to grants to fire companies [and], emergency medical services companies, hazardous materials teams and specialty teams.§ 7802. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advanced life support services." The term shall have the meaning given to it in Chapter 81 (relating to emergency medical services system).["Agency." The Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency.]"Airport fire company." A fire company that does all of the following:(1) Is associated with an airport.(2) Has a mutual aid agreement with a neighboring municipality.(3) Has responded to at least 15 fire or rescue emergency calls annually to neighboring fire companies as provided in documentation requested by the [State Fire Commissioner] commissioner."ALS." Advanced life support."Basic life support services." The term shall have the meaning given to it in Chapter 81 [(relating to emergency medical services system)]."BLS." Basic life support.["Career emergency medical services." As follows:20260HB2134PN2759 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A for-profit chartered emergency medical service corporation, association or organization which meets all of the following:(i) Is located in this Commonwealth.(ii) Is licensed by the Department of Health.(iii) Is not associated or affiliated with a hospital, unless recognized in accordance with section 7823(b.1) (relating to award of grants).(iv) Is regularly engaged in the provision of emergency medical services, including basic life support or advanced life support services and advanced life support squads as defined in 28 Pa. Code § 1027.1 (relating to general provisions).(2) The term shall not include a corporation, association or organization that is primarily engaged in the operation of invalid coaches which are intended for the routine transport of individuals who are convalescent or nonambulatory and who do not ordinarily require emergency medical treatment while in transit.]"Combined fire company." A volunteer fire company located in this Commonwealth with at least one paid employee in addition to a fire chief. The term includes either an independent, nonprofit entity or part of a unit of local government."Commissioner." The State Fire Commissioner."Director." The Director of the Bureau of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of Health."Emergency medical services company" or "EMS company." [A career or volunteer emergency medical services company.] As follows:(1) A municipal, for-profit or nonprofit chartered 20260HB2134PN2759 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 emergency medical service corporation, association or organization which meets all of the following:(i) Is located in this Commonwealth.(ii) Is licensed by the Department of Health to provide emergency medical services as provided under Chapter 81.(iii) Is not associated or affiliated with a hospital, unless recognized in accordance with section 7823(b.1) (relating to award of grants).(iv) Is regularly engaged in the provision of emergency medical services.(2) The term does not include a corporation, association or organization that is primarily engaged in the routine transport of individuals who are convalescent or nonambulatory and who do not ordinarily require emergency medical treatment while in transit."Facility." A structure or portion thereof intended for the purpose of storage or protection of firefighting apparatus, ambulances and rescue vehicles and related equipment and gear. The term does not include meeting halls, social halls, social rooms, lounges or any other facility not directly related to firefighting or the furnishing of ambulance or rescue services."Fire company." A volunteer fire company, a municipal fire company [or a combined volunteer and municipal], an airport fire company or combined fire company located in this Commonwealth. [The term includes an airport fire company.]"Grant program." The Fire Company Grant Program established in Subchapter B (relating to fire company grant program) [or], the Emergency Medical Services Grant Program established in Subchapter C (relating to emergency medical services grant 20260HB2134PN2759 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program)[.] or the Hazardous Materials Team and Specialty Team Grant Program established in Subchapter F (relating to Hazardous Materials Team and Specialty Team Grant Program)."Hazardous materials team." A nonprofit team that is certified by the agency as a hazardous materials response team in accordance with section 209 of the act of December 7, 1990 (P.L.639, No.165), known as the Hazardous Material Emergency Planning and Response Act.["Invalid coach." The term shall have the meaning given to it in Chapter 81 (relating to emergency medical services system).]"Municipal fire company." A firefighting service that is established and operated by a municipality as a part of the unit of local government. The term does not include a nonprofit chartered corporation, independent association or independent organization."Quick response service" or "QRS." The term shall have the meaning given to it in Chapter 81."Specialty team." A nonprofit team engaged in wilderness search and rescue, a nonprofit wildland firefighting team recognized by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources or a nonprofit squad that performs any of the following:(1) Water rescue.(2) Technical rope rescue.(3) Confined space rescue.(4) Trench rescue.["Volunteer EMS company." Any nonprofit chartered corporation, association or organization located in this Commonwealth, which is licensed by the Department of Health and 20260HB2134PN2759 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is not associated or affiliated with any hospital, unless recognized in accordance with section 7823(b.1) (relating to award of grants), and which is regularly engaged in the provision of emergency medical services, including basic life support or advanced life support services and advanced life support squads as defined in 28 Pa. Code § 1027.1 (relating to general provisions). The term shall not include any corporation, association or organization that is primarily engaged in the operation of invalid coaches which are intended for the routine transport of persons who are convalescent or otherwise nonambulatory and do not ordinarily require emergency medical treatment while in transit.]"Volunteer fire company." As follows:(1) A nonprofit chartered corporation, association or organization which meets all of the following:(i) Is located in this Commonwealth [which provides].(ii) Provides fire protection or rescue services and [which] may offer other voluntary emergency services within this Commonwealth. Voluntary emergency services provided by a volunteer fire company may include voluntary ambulance and voluntary rescue services.(2) (Reserved)."Volunteer rescue company." As follows:(1) A nonprofit chartered corporation, association or organization which meets all of the following:(i) Is located in this Commonwealth [that provides].(ii) Provides rescue services as part of the response to fires or vehicle accidents within this Commonwealth.20260HB2134PN2759 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) (Reserved).§ 7812. Publication and notice.The commissioner shall publish notice of the grant program availability through the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin by August 8 for each fiscal year. The commissioner shall post a notice of the grant program and application for the grant program on the Office of the State Fire Commissioner's publicly accessible Internet website. To the greatest extent possible, the commissioner shall utilize a single designated Commonwealth electronic application for the grant programs under this chapter.Section 4. Section 7813(a)(7), (a.1), (a.2), (b)(1), (d) and (e) introductory paragraph and (2)(i) of Title 35 are amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 7813. Award of grants.(a) Authorization.--The commissioner is authorized to make a grant award to each eligible fire company for the following:* * *[(7) Revenue loss for grants issued in 2021 and 2022.](8) Personnel costs.(9) Utility costs.(10) Cancer screenings and other preventive health measures.(11) Mental health awareness and treatment.(a.1) Additional uses for [paid] municipal fire companies.--In addition to the authorized uses under subsection (a), the commissioner may establish additional authorized uses of grant funds for [paid] municipal fire companies. Additional authorized uses established under this subsection must be published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin and on the commissioner's publicly 20260HB2134PN2759 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accessible Internet website.(a.2) Additional grants.--[Each fire company with not more than 20 members who are certified by the National Board on Fire Service Professional Qualifications or by the International Fire Service Accreditation Congress and are verified by the Pennsylvania State Fire Academy at a minimum level of Firefighter 1 on or before July 1 of the year of the grant application shall be eligible to receive additional grants under a certification bonus point system as administered by the commissioner.] The commissioner, in consultation with the State Fire Advisory Board, may establish a system to award additional funds to fire companies. The commissioner shall submit the guidelines for a system to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin concurrently with the notice required under section 7812 (relating to publication and notice). In developing a system, the commissioner shall evaluate the following factors as the factors relate to each eligible fire company on or before July 1 of the year of the grant application:(1) Number and proportion of members who are certified by the National Board on Fire Service Professional Qualifications or by the International Fire Service Accreditation Congress and are verified by the Pennsylvania State Fire Academy at a minimum level of Firefighter 1.(2) Population served.(3) Number of incidents logged in the Pennsylvania Fire Information Reporting System during the prior 12 months.(4) Land area served.(5) Miles of public roadways within the area served.(6) Population density within the area served.20260HB2134PN2759 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) Unique geographic or other natural features within the area served.(8) Estimated cost of proposed uses authorized under subsection (a).(9) Any other factor determined by the commissioner in consultation with the State Fire Advisory Board.(b) Limits.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), grants shall be not less than [$2,500] the higher of $10,000 or the amount received in the 2024-2025 grant cycle and not more than [$20,000] $40,000 per fire company. A fire company may voluntarily agree to accept less than the higher of $10,000 or the amount received in the 2024-2025 grant cycle if the fire company is unable to utilize the full amount the fire company is eligible to receive.* * *(d) Eligibility.--To receive grant funds under this chapter, a fire company must:(1) Have actively responded to at least 15 fire or rescue emergencies during the previous calendar year.(2) Be actively participating in the Pennsylvania Fire Information Reporting System under a signed agreement. The commissioner shall develop and publish guidelines specifying the criteria necessary to determine the level of participation in the Pennsylvania Fire Information Reporting System to remain eligible for grant funds.(3) Have on record with the commissioner up-to-date, point-of-contact information for the fire company or municipality. The contact information shall include a mailing address, a telephone number and an email address and must be 20260HB2134PN2759 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 submitted to the commissioner before July 31 of the grant year.(4) Be registered with the appropriate Public Safety Answering Point as an active response agency.(5) Have an FDID number that is associated solely with the fire company applying for the grant.(6) Be designated by a municipality, by resolution or ordinance, as a provider of fire or rescue services within the municipality.(7) Demonstrate that:(i) the fire company or volunteer rescue squad receives a certification under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6344 (relating to employees having contact with children; adoptive and foster parents) or 6344.2 (relating to volunteers having contact with children) for every member of the fire company or volunteer rescue squad; and(ii) the fire company or volunteer rescue squad does not employ or have as a volunteer member any individual whose employment or participation could be denied under the provisions of 23 Pa.C.S. § 6344(c).(e) Construction Savings Account.--A fire company may apply for a grant under subsection (a) for the purpose of constructing [a new] or renovating a facility. The grant shall be deposited into the Construction Savings Account, which is established within the State Treasury. Money in the Construction Savings Account may be withdrawn by application of the fire company. The Construction Savings Account shall be administered by the commissioner. The following shall apply:* * *(2) For a fire company to withdraw money from the 20260HB2134PN2759 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Construction Savings Account:(i) The application shall contain the signatures of two [duly elected] officers of the fire company or municipality.* * *Section 5. Sections 7814, 7821 and 7822 of Title 35 are amended to read:§ 7814. Consolidation incentive.If two or more [volunteer] fire companies consolidate their use of facilities, equipment, firefighters and services, the consolidated entity may, upon notification of the commissioner, be eligible for a reduction of the interest rate payable on any outstanding principal balance owed, as of the date of consolidation, by any or all of the consolidating companies to the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Loan Fund for loans made under the act of July 15, 1976 (P.L.1036, No.208), known as the Volunteer Fire Company, Ambulance Service and Rescue Squad Assistance Act, or under Subchapter E of Chapter 73 (relating to Fire and Emergency Medical Services Loan Program). The reduction in the interest rate payable shall be from 2% to 1%. Upon receipt of such notification, the commissioner shall determine and verify that the consolidated entity is in fact a bona fide consolidated [volunteer] fire company. If the commissioner determines that the consolidated entity is a bona fide consolidated [volunteer] fire company, the commissioner shall reduce the interest rate payable on any outstanding principal balance owed to the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Loan Fund for loans made under the former Volunteer Fire Company, Ambulance Service and Rescue Squad Assistance Act, or under Subchapter E of Chapter 73, for which the consolidating 20260HB2134PN2759 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 companies or the consolidated entity may be individually or jointly responsible. The commissioner may promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.§ 7821. Establishment.The Emergency Medical Services Grant Program is established and shall be administered by the [commissioner] director. Grants provided under this program shall be used to improve and enhance the capabilities of EMS [to provide ambulance, emergency medical, basic life support and advanced life support services.] companies to provide emergency medical services.§ 7822. Publication and notice.The [commissioner] director shall publish notice of the grant program availability through the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin by August 8 for each fiscal year. To the greatest extent possible, the director shall utilize a single designated Commonwealth electronic application for the grant programs under this chapter.Section 6. Section 7823(a)(1), (2) and (7), (b)(1) and (c) of Title 35, amended June 30, 2025 (P.L.80, No.25), are amended, subsections (a) and (b) are amended by adding paragraphs and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 7823. Award of grants.(a) Authorization.--The [commissioner] director is authorized to make a grant award to each eligible EMS company for the following:(1) Construction and renovation of the EMS company's facilities and purchase or repair of fixtures, furnishings, office equipment and support services necessary to maintain or improve the capability of the services to provide 20260HB2134PN2759 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ambulance, emergency medical, squad, quick response, basic life support and advanced life support services.(2) Repair of ambulance, squad or QRS equipment or purchase thereof.* * *[(7) Revenue loss for grants issued in 2021 and 2022.](8) Personnel costs.(9) Utility costs.(10) Cancer screenings and other preventive health measures.(11) Mental health awareness and treatment.(a.1) Additional grants.--The director may establish a system to award additional funds to EMS companies. The director shall submit the guidelines for a system to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin concurrently with the notice required under section 7812 (relating to publication and notice). In developing a system, the director shall evaluate the following factors as the factors relate to each eligible EMS company on or before July 1 of the year of the grant application:(1) Number and proportion of members who are certified as each type of EMS provider as provided at section 8113(a) (relating to emergency medical services providers).(2) Population served.(3) Number of EMS patient care reports during the prior 12 months as required to be provided to the regional EMS council that is assigned responsibilities for the region in which the EMS company is licensed.(4) Land area served.(5) Miles of public roadways within the area served.20260HB2134PN2759 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Population density within the area served.(7) Unique geographic or other natural features within the area served.(8) Estimated cost of proposed uses authorized under subsection (a).(9) Any other factor determined by the director.(b) Limits.--(1) Grants shall be [not less than $2,500 and not more than $15,000 per EMS company.]:(i) Not less than $2,500 and not more than $10,000 per EMS company whose highest level of licensure is to operate an ALS squad, intermediate ALS squad, BLS squad or quick response service.(ii) Not less than the higher of the amount received in the 2024-2025 grant cycle or $10,000 and not more than $40,000 per EMS company whose highest level of licensure is to operate an ALS ambulance, intermediate ALS ambulance or BLS ambulance service.(1.1) An EMS company may voluntarily agree to accept less than the higher of $10,000 or the amount received in the 2024-2025 grant cycle if the EMS company is unable to utilize the full amount it is eligible to receive.* * *(5) An EMS company may only apply for a grant for up to five years for the purpose under subsection (d).* * *(c) Time for filing application and department action.--(1) By September 8 of each year, the [commissioner] director shall provide applications and written instructions for grants under this chapter to the president or lead 20260HB2134PN2759 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 officer of every EMS company in this Commonwealth.(2) (i) EMS companies seeking grants under this chapter shall submit completed applications to the [commissioner] director.(ii) Except as provided under subparagraph (iii):(A) The application period shall remain open for 45 days each year.(B) The [commissioner] director shall act to approve or disapprove applications within 60 days of the application submission deadline each year.(C) Applications which have not been approved or disapproved by the [commissioner] director within 60 days after the close of the application period each year shall be deemed approved.(iii) Upon request by an EMS company, the [commissioner] director may extend the application period under subparagraph (ii)(A) for up to 45 additional days if the EMS company demonstrates hardship or undue burden that prevents the EMS company from submitting a completed application within the application period and if the EMS company requests the extension within 30 days of the date of the end of the application period. The [commissioner] director shall have sole discretion to determine whether an EMS company has demonstrated hardship or undue burden under this subparagraph.(iv) Upon request by an EMS company, the [commissioner] director shall extend the period to submit required reports for 15 additional days. An EMS company may only make a request under this subparagraph once every three years.20260HB2134PN2759 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Construction Savings Account.--An EMS company may apply for a grant under subsection (a) for the purpose of constructing a new facility or renovating a facility. The grant shall be deposited into the Construction Savings Account, which is established within the State Treasury. Money in the Construction Savings Account may be withdrawn by application of the EMS company. The Construction Savings Account shall be administered by the director. The following shall apply:(1) An EMS company may only access money in the Construction Savings Account for emergency purposes and at the discretion of the director.(2) For an EMS company to withdraw money from the Construction Savings Account:(i) The application shall contain the signatures of two officers of the EMS company or municipality.(ii) The EMS company shall indicate on the application how the money is going to be used under subsection (a).(3) Interest accrued on the Construction Savings Account may be used by the director for administrative purposes.Section 7. Section 7824 of Title 35 is amended to read:§ 7824. Consolidation incentive.After January 1, 2020, if two or more emergency medical services companies consolidate their use of facilities, equipment and services, the consolidated entity may, upon notification of the [commissioner] director, be eligible for a reduction of the interest rate payable on any outstanding principal balance owed, as of the date of consolidation, by any or all of the consolidating companies to the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Loan Fund for loans made under Subchapter E of 20260HB2134PN2759 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Chapter 73 (relating to Fire and Emergency Medical Services Loan Program). The reduction in the interest rate payable shall be from 2% to 1%. Upon receipt of such notification, the [commissioner] director shall determine and verify that the consolidated entity is in fact a bona fide consolidated emergency medical services company. If the [commissioner] director determines that the consolidated entity is a bona fide consolidated emergency medical services company, the [commissioner] director shall reduce the interest rate payable on any outstanding principal balance owed to the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Loan Fund for loans made under Subchapter E of Chapter 73, for which the consolidating companies or the consolidated entity may be individually or jointly responsible. The [commissioner] director may promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.Section 8. Subchapter C.1 of Chapter 78 of Title 35 is repealed:[SUBCHAPTER C.1COVID-19 CRISIS FIRE COMPANY ANDEMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES GRANT PROGRAMSec.7827.1. Establishment.7827.2. Publication and notice.7827.3. Award of grants.§ 7827.1. Establishment.The COVID-19 Crisis Fire Company and Emergency Medical Services Grant Program is established and shall be administered by the agency. Grants provided under the program shall be used by fire companies and EMS companies to provide services during 20260HB2134PN2759 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the novel coronavirus pandemic as identified in the proclamation of disaster emergency issued by the Governor on March 6, 2020, published at 50 Pa.B. 1644 (March 21, 2020), and any renewal of the state of disaster emergency.§ 7827.2. Publication and notice.The agency shall transmit notice of the COVID-19 Crisis Fire Company and Emergency Medical Services Grant Program availability to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin within 30 days of the effective date of this section.§ 7827.3. Award of grants.(a) Authorization.--The agency shall make a grant award from the COVID-19 Crisis Fire Company and Emergency Medical Services Grant Program to:(1) Each eligible fire company that received a grant award in fiscal year 2019-2020 under section 7813 (relating to award of grants) for the purposes under section 7813(a) and (a.1).(2) A fire company that did not apply for or receive a grant award in fiscal year 2019-2020 under section 7813 and that applies for a grant under this subchapter for the purposes under section 7813(a) and (a.1).(3) Each eligible EMS company that received a grant award in fiscal year 2019-2020 under section 7823 (relating to award of grants) for the purposes under section 7823(a).(4) An EMS company that did not apply for or receive a grant award in fiscal year 2019-2020 under section 7823 and that applies for a grant under this subchapter for the purposes under section 7823(a).(b) Amount of award.--The amount of the grant award under 20260HB2134PN2759 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this subchapter shall be the same amount of the grant award for fiscal year 2019-2020 to:(1) An eligible fire company under section 7813.(2) An eligible EMS company under section 7823.(c) Application not required.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), no additional application shall be required for a grant under this subchapter.(2) A fire company under subsection (a)(2) and an EMS company under subsection (a)(4) must file an application for a grant under this subchapter.]Section 9. Sections 7831 and 7832 of Title 35 are amended to read:§ 7831. Fire Company Grant Program.(a) Expenditure.--The sum of $22,000,000 of the amount appropriated to the commissioner for fire company grants under section 1799-E of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, shall be expended for the purpose of making grants to eligible fire companies under Subchapter B (relating to fire company grant program).(b) Transfer.--In addition to sums transferred under subsection (a) and 3 Pa.C.S. § 1113(a) (relating to disposition of certain funds), the sum of $25,700,000 shall be transferred annually from the Property Tax Relief Reserve Fund to the Fire Company Grant Program for the purpose of making grants to eligible fire companies under this subchapter.§ 7832. Emergency Medical Services Company Grant Program.(a) Expenditure.--The sum of $3,000,000 of the amount appropriated to the [commissioner] director for EMS company grants under section 1799-E of the act of April 9, 1929 20260HB2134PN2759 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, shall be expended for the purpose of making grants to eligible EMS companies under Subchapter C (relating to emergency medical services grant program).(b) Transfer.--(1) In addition to sums transferred under subsection (a) and 3 Pa.C.S. § 1113(a) (relating to disposition of certain funds), the sum of $8,100,000 shall be transferred annually from the Property Tax Relief Reserve Fund to the Emergency Medical Services Grant Program for the purpose of making grants to eligible EMS companies under this subchapter.(2) No less than 85% of the money transferred under paragraph (1) shall be used for grants to EMS companies whose highest level of licensure is to operate an ALS ambulance, Intermediate ALS ambulance or BLS ambulance service.Section 10. Sections 7832.1 and 7832.2 of Title 35 are repealed:[§ 7832.1. Additional funding.In addition to sums transferred from the State Gaming Fund and under section 2413(a)(1) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, the sum of $5,000,000 shall be transferred annually from the Property Tax Relief Reserve Fund to the Fire Company Grant Program for the purpose of making grants to eligible fire companies under this subchapter.§ 7832.2. COVID-19 Crisis Fire Company and Emergency Medical Services Grant Program.The following shall apply to any appropriation from money received by the Commonwealth under the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (Public Law 116-136, 134 Stat. 281) 20260HB2134PN2759 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for purposes of making grants under Subchapter C.1 (relating to COVID-19 Crisis Fire Company and Emergency Medical Services Grant Program):(1) The sum of $44,000,000 of the amount appropriated shall be expended for the purpose of making grants to eligible fire companies.(2) The sum of $6,000,000 of the amount appropriated shall be expended for the purpose of making grants to eligible EMS companies.(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), the agency may use up to $200,000 of unencumbered funds from the amount appropriated for administrative costs for the implementation of Subchapter C.1.]Section 11. Title 35 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7832.3. Hazardous materials and specialty funding.The sum of $1,200,000 shall be transferred annually from the Property Tax Relief Reserve Fund to the Hazardous Materials Team and Specialty Team Grant Program for the purpose of making grants to eligible entities under section 7852 (relating to hazardous materials team and specialty team competitive grants).Section 12. Section 7833 of Title 35 is amended to read:§ 7833. Allocation of appropriated funds.(a) Administration.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), no money from the appropriation for grants shall be used for expenses or costs incurred by the commissioner for the administration of the grant programs authorized under Subchapters B (relating to fire company grant program) and [C (relating to emergency medical services grant program).] F (relating to Hazardous Materials Team and Specialty Team Grant Program) or 20260HB2134PN2759 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for expenses or costs incurred by the director for the administration of the grant program authorized under Subchapter C (relating to emergency medical services grant program).(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the commissioner and the director may use not more than [$800,000] $1,200,000 of any unencumbered funds remaining in the fund for administrative costs for grant program implementation under this chapter.[(b) Grant allocation.--Unless otherwise expressly stated, money appropriated to the commissioner for purposes of fire company and EMS company grants shall be allocated as follows:(1) Eighty-eight percent of the amount appropriated shall be used for making grants to eligible fire companies under Subchapter B.(2) Twelve percent of the amount appropriated shall be used for making grants to eligible EMS companies under Subchapter C.](c) Transfers.--Funds appropriated under this chapter that are not spent as of the effective date of this subsection or after each annual grant cycle shall be transferred as follows:(1) 50% of the amount shall be used for the purpose of making grants under section 7385.1 (relating to capital grants for municipal fire departments).(2) 50% of the amount shall be used for the purpose of making grants under section 7385.2 (relating to capital grants for emergency service training centers).Section 13. Subchapter E of Chapter 78 of Title 35 is repealed:[SUBCHAPTER E20260HB2134PN2759 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICESCOVID-19 RECOVERY GRANT PROGRAMSec.7841. Establishment.7842. Award of grants.7843. Funding and costs.7844. Report.§ 7841. Establishment.The Emergency Medical Services COVID-19 Recovery Grant Program is established and shall be administered by the Office of the State Fire Commissioner in consultation with the Department of Health. Grants provided under the Emergency Medical Services COVID-19 Recovery Grant Program shall be used by EMS companies to provide services in response to the novel coronavirus pandemic.§ 7842. Award of grants.(a) Application not required.--No application shall be required to receive a grant under this subchapter.(b) Notification.--The Office of the State Fire Commissioner shall notify in writing each EMS company, as defined under section 7802 (relating to definitions), of the availability of grants from the Emergency Medical Services COVID-19 Recovery Grant Program for the purposes under section 7823(a) (relating to award of grants).(c) Certification.--The Office of the State Fire Commissioner shall include with the written notification under subsection (b) a form for each eligible EMS company to certify that a grant received under this subchapter shall be used for the purposes under section 7823(a) and provide a deadline by which an EMS company must return the certification form.20260HB2134PN2759 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Amount.--Grants shall be awarded under this subchapter in an amount equal to the total amount of funds appropriated under section 7843 (relating to funding and costs) less the amount used under section 7843(b) divided by the total number of EMS companies that returned the certification under subsection (c).(e) Report.--No later than July 30, 2022, each EMS company receiving a grant award under this subchapter shall report to the Office of the State Fire Commissioner how it will use the grant money awarded under subsection (d).§ 7843. Funding and costs.(a) Appropriation.--The sum of $25,000,000 of Federal funds in the COVID-19 Response Restricted Account is appropriated to the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency for the Emergency Medical Services COVID-19 Recovery Grant Program under this subchapter. The provisions of section 111-C(g) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, shall not apply to the amount appropriated under this section.(b) Administrative costs.--The Office of the State Fire Commissioner may use up to $200,000 of unencumbered funds from the amount appropriated under subsection (a) for administrative costs for the implementation of this subchapter.§ 7844. Report.(a) Contents.--The commissioner shall prepare a report on the Emergency Medical Services COVID-19 Recovery Grant Program. The report shall include all of the following information:(1) The total number of EMS companies that were notified of the grant program.(2) The total number of EMS companies that submitted a certification for the grant program.20260HB2134PN2759 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The total number of EMS companies that received a grant.(4) The total amount of the grant received by each EMS company.(5) A summary of how each EMS company will use the grant money awarded under the program.(b) Submission.--The commissioner shall submit the report by September 1, 2022, to all of the following:(1) The chair and minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate.(2) The chair and minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(4) The chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(c) Posting.--The commissioner shall post the annual report on the Office of the State Fire Commissioner's publicly accessible Internet website.]Section 14. Chapter 78 of Title 35 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER FHAZARDOUS MATERIALS TEAM AND SPECIALTYTEAM GRANT PROGRAMSec.7851. Establishment.7852. Hazardous materials team and specialty team competitive grants.§ 7851. Establishment.20260HB2134PN2759 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The Hazardous Materials Team and Specialty Team Grant Program is established and shall be administered by the Office of the State Fire Commissioner.§ 7852. Hazardous materials team and specialty team competitive grants.(a) Awards.--The commissioner shall use money transferred under section 7832.3 (relating to hazardous materials and specialty funding) to establish a grant program for hazardous materials teams and specialty teams.(b) Eligibility.--An eligible grant recipient under this section shall meet all of the following:(1) Be assigned an FDID number.(2) Report incidents in the fire incident reporting system.(3) Have a letter of recommendation from the emergency management coordinator of the host county affirming that the team is a deployable resource.(c) Uses.--The commissioner shall establish authorized uses of grant funds under this section. Additional uses established under this section shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and on the commissioner's publicly accessible Internet website.(d) Guidelines.--The commissioner shall develop guidelines for the grant program, including for the issuance and revocation of FDID numbers for eligible applicants of the grant program, and shall transmit the guidelines to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 15. Section 7891.1 of Title 35, added June 30, 2025 20260HB2134PN2759 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (P.L.80, No.25), is amended to read:§ 7891.1. Expiration of authority.The authority of the commissioner to award grants under Subchapters B (relating to fire company grant program) and [C (relating to emergency medical services grant program)] F (relating to Hazardous Materials Team and Specialty Team Grant Program) and for the director to award grants under Subchapter C (relating to emergency medical services grant program) shall expire December 31, [2029] 2030.Section 16. Sections 7892 and 7893 of Title 35 are repealed:[§ 7892. Expiration of authority relating to COVID-19 Crisis Fire Company and Emergency Medical Services Grant Program.The authority of the agency to award grants under Subchapter C.1 (relating to COVID-19 Crisis Fire Company and Emergency Medical Services Grant Program) shall expire six months after the effective date of this section.§ 7893. Expiration of authority relating to Emergency Medical Services COVID-19 Recovery Grant Program.The authority of the Office of the State Fire Commissioner to award grants under Subchapter E (relating to Emergency Medical Services COVID-19 Recovery Grant Program) shall expire June 30, 2022.]Section 17. Sections 7894(a) and (d) and 7895(a) of Title 35 are amended to read:§ 7894. Special provisions.(a) Claim.--An applicant for a grant under this chapter who failed to return a signed agreement for the preceding year shall not be permitted to apply for a grant in the current year unless the applicant has provided the commissioner or director with a 20260HB2134PN2759 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reasonable written explanation as to why it did not claim its grant prior to the beginning of the application period.* * *(d) Approval.--An applicant shall not be approved for a grant to be used for purposes other than those stated in section 7813(a) (relating to award of grants) [or], 7823(a) (relating to award of grants) or 7852(c) (relating to hazardous materials team and specialty team competitive grants).§ 7895. Annual reports.(a) Contents.--The commissioner, in consultation with the director, shall prepare an annual report on the Fire Company Grant Program [and], the Emergency Medical Services Grant Program and the Hazardous Materials Team and Specialty Team Grant Program. The annual report shall include all of the following information:(1) The total number of fire companies [and], EMS companies, hazardous materials teams and specialty teams that were notified of the grant programs.(2) The total number of fire companies [and], EMS companies, hazardous materials teams and specialty teams that submitted applications for the grant programs.(3) The total number of fire companies [and], EMS companies, hazardous materials teams and specialty teams that were approved for grants.(4) An analysis of how the grants to fire companies and EMS companies were used for facilities, equipment, debt reduction, training and certification, the education of the general public, construction savings accounts and recruitment and retention, including length of service award programs, as delineated by county and municipality.20260HB2134PN2759 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [(5) A list of the fire companies as delineated by county that received additional grants under section 7813(a.2) (relating to award of grants).](6) A list of the different entities that received grants, including hazardous materials teams, specialty teams, combined fire companies, municipal fire companies, volunteer fire companies[, municipal emergency medical services companies and volunteer] and EMS companies.(7) A list of the different reasons why grants were not issued to fire companies [and], EMS companies, hazardous materials teams and specialty teams, including, but not limited to, the following:(i) Failure to submit applications for the grant programs.(ii) Failure to run calls for emergencies.(iii) Delinquencies and bankruptcies.(8) A list of the fire companies and EMS companies that utilized the grants to pay off loans under the Pennsylvania Fire and Emergency Medical Services Loan Program.* * *Section 18. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The addition of 35 Pa.C.S. § 7852 shall take effect in 180 days.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2134PN2759 - 30 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425